Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 12. Senior Health Care Districts

History.

2020 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 17, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 35-2-1201.
Senior health care districts; establishment; definitions.

A senior health care district may be established under the procedures for petitioning, hearing and election of special districts as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

As used in this article “senior health care” means “health care” as defined in W.S. 35-22-402(a)(viii) that is delivered to a person who is at least sixty (60) years of age, a disabled adult who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, or a person with medical or behavioral health care needs as determined by appropriate medical assessments and is provided:

By a person or facility licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession to provide health care services;

Through home care services, assisted living programs, skilled nursing facilities, nursing homes, hospice services, residential care homes or other related facilities; or

As specified under W.S. 18-15-111(a)(i) through (iii).

History.

2020 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 17, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 35-2-1202.
Body corporate; name and style; powers generally; rules and regulations of trustees.

Each district is a body corporate and shall be designated by the name of the .... senior health care district. The district name shall be entered upon the commissioners’ records and shall be selected by the commissioners of the county in which the greater area of land within the district is located. In the name so selected, the district through its trustees may:

Direct the affairs of the district in the same manner as a rural health care district under W.S. 35-2-703(a)(i) through (xi) for the purpose of providing senior health care;

Provide directly or by contract for the provision of programs or services under this article. Contracts under this section shall:

Require the provider, if an organization or agency, to be incorporated under the laws of this state as a nonprofit corporation prior to the receipt of any funds;

Specify the manner in which the funds are expended and the programs or services provided; and

Require the provider of the programs or services to present an annual budget for review to determine compliance with this article and for approval by the district.

History.

2020 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 17, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 35-2-1203.
Administration of finances; assessment and levy of taxes.

The board of trustees of a senior health care district shall administer the finances of the district according to the provisions of the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act, except that an annual audit in accordance with W.S.

16-4-121

is not required. Each senior health care district shall comply with the provisions of W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii).

The assessor shall assess the property of each senior health care district.

The board of county commissioners, at the time of making the levy for county purposes shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in the district in its county for its proportionate share based on assessed valuation of the estimated amount of funds needed by each senior health care district but in no case shall the tax for the district exceed in any one (1) year the amount of two (2) mills on each dollar of assessed valuation of the property.

History.

2020 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "special" preceding "district shall comply" in the second sentence of (a).

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 17, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 35-2-1204.
Applicability.

A senior health care district shall be operated, administered and is otherwise subject to the provisions that govern a rural health care district under Wyoming statutes, title 35, chapter 2, article 7, except W.S.

35-2-701

,

35-2-705

and

35-2-708

shall not apply. W.S.

35-2-711

through

35-2-722

shall not apply to W.S.

35-2-1203

. The question of approval of the issuance of bonds for senior health care purposes pursuant to W.S. 35-2-709(a) shall be submitted to electors only at a general election.

History.

2020 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 17, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.